Rhode Island statutes. Title 22 General Assembly
Chapter 7.1 Permanent Joint Committee on Water Resources

22-7.1-1.
Permanent committee — Composition.

There is created a permanent joint committee of the general assembly on water resources to consist of seven (7) members of the general assembly, four (4) of whom shall be from the house of representatives to be appointed by the speaker, not more than three (3) of whom shall be from the same political party; three (3) of whom shall be from the senate to be appointed by the president of the senate, not more than two (2) of whom shall be from the same political party. Vacancies shall be filled in like manner as the original appointments. The members of the joint committee on water resources shall serve so long as they shall remain members of the house from which they were appointed and until their successors are duly appointed and qualified.

History of Section.

P.L. 1966, ch. 108, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 105, § 15; P.L. 2001, ch. 180, § 25.

22-7.1-2.
Selection of officers.

Upon organization of the joint committee, by majority vote, one of their members shall be chosen as chairperson, another of their members shall be chosen vice-chairperson, and another of their members shall be chosen as secretary.

History of Section.

P.L. 1966, ch. 108, § 1.

22-7.1-3.
Duties.

It shall be the duty of the joint committee to consult and counsel with the state water resources board, the water department of the several cities, towns and water districts of the state, and all federal, state, and municipal agencies and quasi-municipal corporations dealing with development and operation of water supplies, water control structures, water works, purification plants, desalination methods and plants, and water pipe lines and distribution systems, and to conduct a continuing study and review of the water requirements, resources, supplies, and methods of acquisition and distribution throughout the state. It shall constantly review the needs and water resources of all the communities of the state and explore the desirability of merging or integrating several water departments and water companies. It shall investigate the feasibility of utilizing water reservoirs for recreational purposes. It shall also evaluate the reasonableness of water rates and charges.

History of Section.

P.L. 1966, ch. 108, § 1.

22-7.1-4.
Reports and recommendations.

The joint committee on water resources shall from time to time and at least annually report to the general assembly on its findings and the results of its studies and make any recommendations to the general assembly and propose any legislation that it shall deem advisable to assure adequate supplies of water for all the people of the state for domestic, industrial, agricultural, and recreational use.

History of Section.

P.L. 1966, ch. 108, § 1.

22-7.1-5.
Technical assistance.

The joint committee shall, if it finds it cannot obtain the proper assistance from available sources, contract for any technical services that it shall require to effectuate its purposes.

History of Section.

P.L. 1966, ch. 108, § 1.

22-7.1-6.
References to committee.

Each branch of the legislature shall refer to the joint committee all bills and resolutions dealing with or affecting the resources, supplies, conservation, processing, acquisition, and distribution of water.

History of Section.

P.L. 1966, ch. 108, § 1.

22-7.1-7.
Place of meeting — Quorum.

The joint committee on legislative services shall provide adequate space in the state house for the use of the joint committee on water resources; provided, that the joint committee on water resources may conduct hearings and hold meetings elsewhere when doing so will better serve its purposes. A majority in number of the joint committee on water resources shall be necessary to constitute a quorum for the transaction of business.

History of Section.

P.L. 1966, ch. 108, § 1.